Illinois, session 104th, HB4718.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Revenue Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 62505-350 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2505/2505-350 new)8    Sec. 2505-350. Fees for requesting copies and certified 9copies of tax returns. Upon request from a taxpayer or other 10authorized person, the Department may provide copies of tax 11returns at the rate of $5 per copy per month, year, or other 12filing period. If certification is required, the Department 13may charge an additional $5 per certified copy. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.